Florida, session 2026, SB1394.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 93 94 Section 1.âParagraph (b) of subsection (9) of section 95 20.165, Florida Statutes, is amended to read: 96 20.165âDepartment of Business and Professional Regulation. 97 There is created a Department of Business and Professional 98 Regulation. 99 (9) 100 (b)âEach employee serving as a law enforcement officer for 101 the division must meet the qualifications for employment or 102 appointment as a law enforcement officer set forth under s. 103 943.13 and must be certified as a law enforcement officer by the 104 Department of Law Enforcement under chapter 943. Upon 105 certification, each law enforcement officer is subject to and 106 has the same authority as provided for law enforcement officers 107 generally in chapter 901 and has statewide jurisdiction. Each 108 officer also has arrest authority as provided for state law 109 enforcement officers in s. 901.15. Each officer possesses the 110 full law enforcement powers granted to other peace officers of 111 this state, including the authority to make arrests, carry 112 firearms, serve court process, and seize contraband and the 113 proceeds of illegal activities. 114 1.âThe primary responsibility of each officer appointed 115 under this section is to investigate, enforce, and prosecute, 116 throughout the state, violations and violators of parts I and II 117 of chapter 210, chapter 310, chapter 326, parts I and III of 118 chapter 450, chapter 455, parts VI-IX, XI, XII, XV, and XVI of 119 chapter 468, chapter 469, chapter 471, chapters 473-477, chapter 120 481, parts I and II of chapter 489, chapter 499, chapter 509, 121 chapter 548, chapter 553, part VII of chapter 559, and chapters 122 561-569, chapters 718 and 719, chapter 721, and chapter 723, and 123 the rules adopted thereunder, as well as other state laws that 124 the division, all state law enforcement officers, or beverage 125 enforcement agents are specifically authorized to enforce. 126 2.âThe secondary responsibility of each officer appointed 127 under this section is to enforce all other state laws, provided 128 that the enforcement is incidental to exercising the officerâs 129 primary responsibility as provided in subparagraph 1., and the 130 officer exercises the powers of a deputy sheriff, only after 131 consultation or coordination with the appropriate local 132 sheriffâs office or municipal police department or when the 133 division participates in the Florida Mutual Aid Plan during a 134 declared state emergency. 135 Section 2.âParagraph (a) of subsection (3) of section 136 448.095, Florida Statutes, is amended, and paragraph (c) is 137 added to that subsection, to read: 138 448.095âEmployment eligibility.â 139 (3)âENFORCEMENT.â 140 (a)âFor the purpose of enforcement of this section, any of 141 the following persons or entities may request, and an employer 142 must provide, copies of any documentation relied upon by the 143 employer for the verification of a new employeeâs employment 144 eligibility: 145 1.âThe Department of Law Enforcement; 146 2.âThe Attorney General; 147 3.âThe state attorney in the circuit in which the new 148 employee works; 149 4.âThe statewide prosecutor; or 150 5.âThe Department of Commerce; or 151 6.âThe Department of Business and Professional Regulation. 152 (c)âIf the Department of Business and Professional 153 Regulation believes an employer violated subsection (2) or s. 154 448.09, it must notify the Department of Commerce and the 155 Department of Law Enforcement within 30 days after making such 156 determination. 157 Section 3.âSubsection (7) of section 468.412, Florida 158 Statutes, is amended to read: 159 468.412âTalent agency regulations; prohibited acts.â 160 (7)(a)âA No talent agency may not send or cause to be sent 161 a any person as an employee or a minor to a any house of ill 162 fame, to a any house or place of amusement for immoral purposes, 163 or to a any place resorted to for the purposes of prostitution, 164 the character of which places the talent agency could have 165 ascertained upon reasonable inquiry. A person who violates this 166 paragraph commits a felony of the third degree, punishable as 167 provided in s. 775.082, s. 775.083, or s. 775.084 to any place 168 for the modeling or photographing of a minor in the nude in the 169 absence of written permission from the minorâs parents or legal 170 guardians, the character of which places the talent agency could 171 have ascertained upon reasonable inquiry. 172 (b)âA talent agency may not send or cause to be sent a 173 minor to any place for the purpose of modeling or photographing 174 in the nude unless given written permission from the minorâs 175 parent or legal guardian. A person who violates this paragraph 176 commits a felony of the third degree, punishable as provided in 177 s. 775.082, s. 775.083, or s. 775.084. 178 Section 4.âSubsection (1) of section 509.261, Florida 179 Statutes, is amended to read: 180 509.261âRevocation or suspension of licenses; fines; 181 procedure.â 182 (1)âAny public lodging establishment or public food service 183 establishment that has operated or is operating in violation of 184 this chapter, s. 581.217(7), or the rules of the division, 185 operating without a license, or operating with a suspended or 186 revoked license may be subject by the division to: 187 (a)âFines not to exceed $1,000 per offense; 188 (b)âMandatory completion, at personal expense, of a 189 remedial educational program administered by a food safety 190 training program provider approved by the division, as provided 191 in s. 509.049; and 192 (c)âThe suspension, revocation, or refusal of a license 193 issued pursuant to this chapter. 194 Section 5.âPresent subsection (3) of section 559.79, 195 Florida Statutes, is redesignated as subsection (4), and a new 196 subsection (3) is added to that section, to read: 197 559.79âApplications for license or renewal.â 198 (3)(a)âAn application for a license or renewal of a license 199 issued by the department may be evaluated to validate the 200 applicantâs or licenseeâs identity and work authorization 201 status. As part of the validation process, the department may 202 request personal identification information, including, but not 203 limited to, any of the following: 204 1.âSocial security number. 205 2.âPassport, including visa information. 206 3.âBirth certificate. 207 4.âImmigration status. 208 5.âAlien registration number. 209 6.âStudent and Exchange Visitor Information System 210 identification number. 211 7.âNaturalization or citizenship certificate number. 212 8.âArrival and departure record. 213 9.âPermanent resident card. 214 10.âEmployment authorization documents. 215 11.âCertificate of citizenship. 216 12âNaturalization certificate. 217 13.âRefugee travel document. 218 14.âState-issued identification. 219 (b)âThe department may submit an applicantâs or licenseeâs 220 personal identification information to the appropriate federal 221 agencies for the purpose of validating the applicantâs or 222 licenseeâs identity or work authorization status. 223 (c)âThe department shall immediately suspend the license of 224 any licensee found not to have a work authorization status that 225 entitles the licensee to work in the United States. The 226 department shall reinstate the license, without additional 227 charge to the licensee, upon verification with the appropriate 228 federal agencies that the licensee is authorized to work in the 229 United States. 230 (d)âThe department is not liable for any licensure delay, 231 denial, or suspension resulting from the discharge of its duties 232 under this subsection. 233 (e)âThe department may enter into memoranda of 234 understanding with the appropriate federal agencies to validate 235 an applicantâs or licenseeâs identity or work authorization 236 status. 237 (f)âThe department may adopt rules to implement this 238 section. 239 Section 6.âSection 569.006, Florida Statutes, is amended to 240 read: 241 569.006âRetail tobacco products dealers; administrative 242 penalties.âThe division may suspend or revoke the permit of the 243 dealer upon sufficient cause appearing of the violation of any 244 law of this state or any state or territory of the United States 245 of the provisions of this chapter , including part II of this 246 chapter if the dealer deals, at retail, in nicotine products 247 within this the state, or allows a nicotine products vending 248 machine to be located on its premises within this the state, by 249 a dealer or by a dealerâs agent or employee. The division may 250 also assess and accept administrative fines of up to $1,000 251 against a dealer for each violation. The division shall deposit 252 all fines collected into the General Revenue Fund as collected. 253 An order imposing an administrative fine becomes effective 15 254 days after the date of the order. The division may suspend the 255 imposition of a penalty against a dealer, conditioned upon the 256 dealerâs compliance with terms the division considers 257 appropriate. 258 Section 7.âSection 569.24, Florida Statutes, is created to 259 read: 260 569.24âSelling, furnishing, or giving nitrous oxide 261 prohibited by retailers of tobacco or nicotine products; 262 exceptions.â 263 (1)(a)âA dealer licensed under this chapter, or a dealerâs 264 agents or employees, may not possess, sell, possess with intent 265 to sell, deliver, or give, directly or indirectly, nitrous oxide 266 of any quantity on or from their licensed premises. 267 (b)âThis subsection does not apply to establishments 268 licensed under this chapter and operating as a grocery store if 269 such establishment has a licensed premises comprised of at least 270 10,000 square feet of retail floor space dedicated to the 271 display and sale of groceries and does not qualify as a 272 âconvenience businessâ as defined in s. 812.171. 273 (2)âAny dealer, or a dealerâs agents or employees, who 274 violates subsection (1) commits a felony of the third degree, 275 punishable as provided in s. 775.082, s.775.083, or s. 775.084. 276 Section 8.âSection 569.35, Florida Statutes, is amended to 277 read: 278 569.35âRetail nicotine product dealers; administrative 279 penalties.âThe division may suspend or revoke the permit of a 280 dealer, including the retail tobacco products dealer permit of a 281 retail tobacco products dealer as defined in s. 569.002(4), upon 282 sufficient cause appearing of the violation of any law of this 283 state or any state or territory of the United States of the 284 provisions of this part, by a dealer, or by a dealerâs agent or 285 employee. The division may also assess and accept an 286 administrative fine of up to $1,000 against a dealer for each 287 violation. The division shall deposit all fines collected into 288 the General Revenue Fund as collected. An order imposing an 289 administrative fine becomes effective 15 days after the date of 290 the order. The division may suspend the imposition of a penalty 291 against a dealer, conditioned upon the dealerâs compliance with 292 terms the division considers appropriate. 293 Section 9.âSubsections (1), (4), and (5) of section 294 877.111, Florida Statutes, are amended to read: 295 877.111âInhalation, ingestion, possession, sale, purchase, 296 or transfer of harmful chemical substances; penalties.â 297 (1)âIt is unlawful for any person to inhale or ingest, or 298 to possess with intent to breathe, inhale, or drink, any 299 compound, liquid, or chemical containing toluol, hexane, 300 trichloroethylene, acetone, toluene, ethyl acetate, methyl ethyl 301 ketone, trichloroethane, isopropanol, methyl isobutyl ketone, 302 ethylene glycol monomethyl ether acetate, cyclohexanone, nitrous 303 oxide, diethyl ether, alkyl nitrites (butyl nitrite), or any 304 similar substance for the purpose of inducing a condition of 305 intoxication or which distorts or disturbs the auditory, visual, 306 or mental processes. This section does not apply to the 307 possession and use of these substances as part of the care or 308 treatment of a disease or injury by a practitioner licensed 309 under chapter 458, chapter 459, part I of chapter 464, or 310 chapter 466, or to beverages controlled by the provisions of 311 chapter 561, chapter 562, chapter 563, chapter 564, or chapter 312 565. 313 (4)âAny person who knowingly distributes, sells, purchases, 314 transfers, or possesses more than 16 grams of nitrous oxide 315 commits a felony of the third degree which shall be known as 316 unlawful distribution of nitrous oxide, punishable as provided 317 in s. 775.082, s. 775.083, or s. 775.084. For purposes of this 318 subsection, in addition to proving by any other means that 319 nitrous oxide was knowingly possessed, distributed, sold, 320 purchased, or transferred, proof that any person discharged, or 321 aided another in discharging, nitrous oxide to inflate a balloon 322 or any other object suitable for subsequent inhalation creates 323 an inference of the personâs knowledge that the nitrous oxideâs 324 use was for an unlawful purpose. This subsection does not apply 325 to the possession and use of nitrous oxide as part of the care 326 and treatment of a disease or injury by a practitioner licensed 327 under chapter 458, chapter 459, chapter 464, chapter 466, or 328 chapter 474; as a food processing propellant; as a semiconductor 329 oxidizer; as an analytical chemistry oxidizer in atomic 330 absorption spectrometry; in the production of chemicals used to 331 inflate airbags; as an oxidizer for chemical production, 332 combustion, or jet propulsion; or as a motor vehicle induction 333 additive when mixed with sulphur dioxide. 334 (5)âAny person who violates any of the provisions of this 335 section may, in the discretion of the trial judge, be required 336 to participate in a substance abuse services program approved or 337 regulated by the Department of Children and Families pursuant to 338 the provisions of chapter 397, provided the director of the 339 program approves the placement of the defendant in the program. 340 Such required participation may be imposed in addition to, or in 341 lieu of, any penalty or probation otherwise prescribed by law. 342 However, the total time of such penalty, probation, and program 343 participation may shall not exceed the maximum length of 344 sentence possible for the offense. 345 Section 10.âSection 877.113, Florida Statutes, is created 346 to read: 347 877.113âInhalation, ingestion, possession, sale, purchase, 348 or transfer of nitrous oxide; penalties; exemption.â 349 (1)âIt is unlawful for any person to inhale or ingest, or 350 possess with intent to inhale or ingest, any compound, liquid, 351 or chemical containing nitrous oxide for the purpose of inducing 352 a condition of intoxication or a condition that distorts or 353 disturbs the auditory, visual, or mental processes. 354 (2)âA person who violates subsection (1) commits a 355 misdemeanor of the second degree, punishable as provided in s. 356 775.082 or s. 775.083. 357 (3)âA person who knowingly possesses more than 16 grams of 358 nitrous oxide commits a felony of the third degree, punishable 359 as provided in s. 775.082, s. 775.083, or s. 775.084. 360 (4)âA person who knowingly distributes, sells, purchases, 361 or transfers nitrous oxide to another person for purposes of 362 intoxication commits a felony of the third degree, punishable as 363 provided in s. 775.082, s. 775.083, or s. 775.084. 364 (5)âA person who knowingly distributes, sells, purchases, 365 or transfers nitrous oxide to a person younger than 18 years of 366 age for purposes of intoxication commits a felony of the second 367 degree, punishable as provided in s. 775.082, s. 775.083, or s. 368 775.084. 369 (6)âA person who knowingly distributes, sells, or possesses 370 with intent to sell flavored nitrous oxide commits a felony of 371 the third degree, punishable as provided in s. 775.082, s. 372 775.083, or s. 775.084. Subsection (9) does not apply to this 373 subsection. 374 (7)âThe possession or presence of any drug paraphernalia as 375 defined in s. 893.145 constitutes prima facie evidence that a 376 person possessed, distributed, sold, transferred, or possessed 377 with intent to sell, inhaled, or ingested nitrous oxide for 378 purposes of intoxication. 379 (8)âA court may require a person who violates this section 380 to participate in a substance abuse services program approved or 381 regulated by the Department of Children and Families pursuant to 382 chapter 397, provided that the director of the program approves 383 the placement of the defendant in the program. Such required 384 participation may be imposed in addition to, or in lieu of, any 385 penalty or probation otherwise prescribed by law. However, the 386 total time of such penalty, probation, or program participation 387 may not exceed the maximum sentence possible for the offense. 388 (9)âThis section does not apply to the possession and use 389 of nitrous oxide by a practitioner licensed under chapter 458, 390 chapter 459, chapter 464, chapter 466, or chapter 474 as part of 391 the care and treatment of a disease or injury; as a food 392 processing propellant; as a semiconductor oxidizer; as an 393 analytical chemistry oxidizer in atomic absorption spectrometry; 394 in the production of chemicals used to inflate airbags; as an 395 oxidizer for chemical production, combustion, or jet propulsion; 396 or as a motor vehicle induction additive when mixed with sulfur 397 dioxide. 398 Section 11.âSubsection (1) of section 316.193, Florida 399 Statutes, is amended to read: 400 316.193âDriving under the influence; penalties.â 401 (1)âA person commits is guilty of the offense of driving 402 under the influence and is subject to punishment as provided in 403 subsection (2) if the person is driving or in actual physical 404 control of a vehicle within this state and: 405 (a)âThe person is under the influence of alcoholic 406 beverages, any chemical substance set forth in ss. 877.111 and 407 877.113 s. 877.111, or any substance controlled under chapter 408 893, when affected to the extent that the personâs normal 409 faculties are impaired; 410 (b)âThe person has a blood-alcohol level of 0.08 or more 411 grams of alcohol per 100 milliliters of blood; or 412 (c)âThe person has a breath-alcohol level of 0.08 or more 413 grams of alcohol per 210 liters of breath. 414 Section 12.âFor the purpose of incorporating the amendment 415 made by this act to section 448.095, Florida Statutes, in a 416 reference thereto, subsection (2) of section 448.09, Florida 417 Statutes, is reenacted to read: 418 448.09âUnauthorized aliens; employment prohibited.â 419 (2)âIf the Department of Commerce finds or is notified by 420 an entity specified in s. 448.095(3)(a) that an employer has 421 knowingly employed an unauthorized alien without verifying the 422 employment eligibility of such person, the department must enter 423 an order pursuant to chapter 120 making such determination and 424 require repayment of any economic development incentive pursuant 425 to s. 288.061(6). 426 Section 13.âFor the purpose of incorporating the amendment 427 made by this act to section 877.111, Florida Statutes, in a 428 reference thereto, subsection (12) of section 893.145, Florida 429 Statutes, is reenacted to read: 430 893.145ââDrug paraphernaliaâ defined.âThe term âdrug 431 paraphernaliaâ means all equipment, products, and materials of 432 any kind which are used, intended for use, or designed for use 433 in planting, propagating, cultivating, growing, harvesting, 434 manufacturing, compounding, converting, producing, processing, 435 preparing, testing, analyzing, packaging, repackaging, storing, 436 containing, concealing, transporting, injecting, ingesting, 437 inhaling, or otherwise introducing into the human body a 438 controlled substance in violation of this chapter or s. 877.111. 439 Drug paraphernalia is deemed to be contraband which shall be 440 subject to civil forfeiture. The term includes, but is not 441 limited to: 442 (12)âObjects used, intended for use, or designed for use in 443 ingesting, inhaling, or otherwise introducing controlled 444 substances, as described in s. 893.03, or substances described 445 in s. 877.111(1) into the human body, such as: 446 (a)âMetal, wooden, acrylic, glass, stone, plastic, or 447 ceramic pipes, with or without screens, permanent screens, 448 hashish heads, or punctured metal bowls. 449 (b)âWater pipes. 450 (c)âCarburetion tubes and devices. 451 (d)âSmoking and carburetion masks. 452 (e)âRoach clips: meaning objects used to hold burning 453 material, such as a cannabis cigarette, that has become too 454 small or too short to be held in the hand. 455 (f)âMiniature cocaine spoons, and cocaine vials. 456 (g)âChamber pipes. 457 (h)âCarburetor pipes. 458 (i)âElectric pipes. 459 (j)âAir-driven pipes. 460 (k)âChillums. 461 (l)âBongs. 462 (m)âIce pipes or chillers. 463 (n)âA cartridge or canister, which means a small metal 464 device used to contain nitrous oxide. 465 (o)âA charger, sometimes referred to as a âcracker,â which 466 means a small metal or plastic device that contains an interior 467 pin that may be used to expel nitrous oxide from a cartridge or 468 container. 469 (p)âA charging bottle, which means a device that may be 470 used to expel nitrous oxide from a cartridge or canister. 471 (q)âA whip-it, which means a device that may be used to 472 expel nitrous oxide. 473 (r)âA tank. 474 (s)âA balloon. 475 (t)âA hose or tube. 476 (u)âA 2-liter-type soda bottle. 477 (v)âDuct tape. 478 Section 14.âFor the purpose of incorporating the amendment 479 made by this act to section 877.111, Florida Statutes, in a 480 reference thereto, subsection (1) of section 948.15, Florida 481 Statutes, is reenacted to read: 482 948.15âMisdemeanor probation services.â 483 (1)âA defendant found guilty of a misdemeanor who is placed 484 on probation shall be under supervision not to exceed 6 months 485 unless otherwise specified by the court. Probation supervision 486 services for a defendant found guilty of a misdemeanor for 487 possession of a controlled substance or drug paraphernalia under 488 chapter 893 may be provided by a licensed substance abuse 489 education and intervention program, which may provide substance 490 abuse education and intervention as well as any other terms and 491 conditions of probation. In relation to any offense other than a 492 felony in which the use of alcohol; a controlled substance, as 493 defined in s. 893.02; a controlled substance analog, as defined 494 in s. 893.0356; or a chemical substance described in s. 495 877.111(1) is a significant factor, the period of probation may 496 be up to 1 year. 497 Section 15.âThis act shall take effect July 1, 2026.